Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-101.03
Oath; affirmation; effect.

Whenever an oath is required by section 11-101 or 11-101.01, the affirmation of a person conscientiously scrupulous of taking an oath shall have the same effect.

Laws 1951, c. 206, § 5, p. 768.